New Jersey, session 221, A317.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Governor, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, and the Minority Leader of the General Assembly shall meet together at the State House in Trenton at least once each quarter of each calendar year for a period of time of not less than two hours.  The initial portion of any meeting shall be private.  The private portion of a meeting shall be followed by a portion that is open to the public.  The Governor and each legislative leader shall discuss the state of the State, pending legislation, ideas for legislation, public policy issues, and any matter that may be of interest to the people of this State.  The Governor and each legislative leader shall have the opportunity to speak.  During the public portion of any meeting the Governor and each legislative leader shall report to the public on the state of the State and, at the discretion of that individual, may accept and respond to questions from members of the public. The Governor and each legislative leader shall attend every meeting in person for the duration thereof and shall not be represented by any other person. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.